Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 5. Cancellation of Registration.

§ 24.2-426.
Repealed by Acts 1997, c. 805.

Editor’s note.

Former §

24.2-426

, related to voluntary cancellation of registration, was derived from Code 1950, § 24-68; 1952, c. 341; 1958, c. 576; 1960, c. 288; 1962, c. 536; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-48; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 205; 1972, c. 620; 1974, c. 428; 1977, c. 490; 1980, c. 639; 1989, c. 138; 1992, c. 433; 1993, c. 641; 1996, cc. 72, 73.

§ 24.2-427.
Cancellation of registration by voter or for persons known to be deceased or disqualified to vote.

Any registered voter may cancel his registration and have his name removed from the central registration records by signing an authorization for cancellation and mailing or otherwise submitting the signed authorization to the general registrar. When submitted by any means other than when notarized or in person, such cancellation must be made at least 22 days prior to an election in order to be valid in that election. The general registrar shall acknowledge receipt of the authorization and advise the voter in person or by first-class mail that his registration has been canceled within 10 days of receipt of such authorization.

The general registrar shall promptly cancel the registration of (i) all persons known by him to be deceased; (ii) all persons known by him to be disqualified to vote by reason of a felony conviction or adjudication of incapacity; (iii) all persons known by him not to be United States citizens by reason of reports from the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to §

24.2-410.1

or from the Department of Elections based on information received from the Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements Program (SAVE Program) pursuant to subsection E of §

24.2-404

and in accordance with the requirements of subsection C; (iv) all persons for whom a notice has been received, signed by the voter, or from the registration official of another jurisdiction that the voter has moved from the Commonwealth; and (v) all persons for whom a notice has been received, signed by the voter, or from the registration official of another jurisdiction that the voter has registered to vote outside the Commonwealth, subsequent to his registration in Virginia. The notice received in clauses (iv) and (v) shall be considered as a written request from the voter to have his registration cancelled. A voter’s registration may be cancelled at any time during the year in which the general registrar discovers that the person is no longer entitled to be registered. The general registrar shall provide notice of any cancellation to the person whose registration is cancelled, by mail to the address listed in the voter’s registration record and by email to the email address provided on the voter’s registration application, if one was provided.

The general registrar shall mail notice promptly to all persons known by him not to be United States citizens by reason of a report from the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to §

24.2-410.1

or from the Department of Elections based on information received from the Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements Program (SAVE Program) pursuant to subsection E of §

24.2-404

prior to cancelling their registrations. The notice shall inform the person of the report from the Department of Motor Vehicles or from the Department of Elections and allow the person to submit his sworn statement that he is a United States citizen within 14 days of the date that the notice was mailed. The general registrar shall cancel the registrations of such persons who do not respond within 14 days to the notice that they have been reported not to be United States citizens.

The general registrar shall (i) process the Department’s most recent list of persons convicted of felonies within 21 to 14 days before any primary or general election, (ii) cancel the registration of any registered voter shown to have been convicted of a felony who has not provided evidence that his right to vote has been restored, and (iii) send prompt notice to the person of the cancellation of his registration. If it appears that any registered voter has made a false statement on his registration application with respect to his having been convicted of a felony, the general registrar shall report the fact to the attorney for the Commonwealth for prosecution under §

24.2-1016

for a false statement made on his registration application.

The general registrar may cancel the registration of any person for whom a notice has been submitted to the Department of Motor Vehicles in accordance with the Driver License Compact set out in Article 18 (§

46.2-483

et seq.) of Chapter 3 of Title 46.2 and forwarded to the general registrar, that the voter has moved from the Commonwealth; provided that the registrar shall mail notice of such cancellation to the person at both his new address, as reported to the Department of Motor Vehicles, and the address at which he had most recently been registered in Virginia. No general registrar may cancel registrations under this authority while the registration records are closed pursuant to §

24.2-416

. No registrar may cancel the registration under this authority of any person entitled to register under the provisions of subsection A of §

24.2-420.1

, and shall reinstate the registration of any otherwise qualified voter covered by subsection A of §

24.2-420.1

who applies to vote within four years of the date of cancellation.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-59, 24-60, 24-60.1, 24-71 through 24-73, 24-90, 24-93, 24-94, 24-101, 24-111; 1958, c. 576; 1962, cc. 422, 536; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-46(12); 1972, c. 620; 1973, c. 30; 1974, c. 428; 1976, c. 616; 1979, c. 329; 1980, c. 639; 1982, c. 650; 1983, c. 398; 1984, c. 480; 1986, c. 558; 1990, c. 193; 1993, c. 641; 1996, cc. 72, 73; 1997, cc. 801, 805; 1999, c. 851; 2000, c. 857; 2001, c. 634; 2002, cc. 785, 819; 2006 cc. 926, 940; 2007, c. 318; 2008, c. 382; 2012, c. 686; 2013, c. 686; 2015, c. 740; 2022, cc. 4, 28, 318.

The 1999 amendment,

in the first paragraph, substituted “and mailing or otherwise submitting the signed authorization to the general registrar” for “in person at the office of the general registrar or by otherwise submitting an authorization for cancellation, signed by him and notarized,” and added the last two sentences.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 857 substituted “twenty-nine days” for “sixty days” in the second sentence of the first undesignated paragraph; and substituted “Commonwealth” for “county or city” at the end of the first sentence in the second undesignated paragraph.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 634 added the subsection A and B designators to the first and second paragraphs, and added subsection C.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 785 and 819 are identical, and in the last sentence of subsection C, deleted “absentee” following “register,” and twice substituted “subsection A of §

24.2-420.1

” for “§

24.2-419

.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 926 and 940, effective January 1, 2007, are identical, and in subsection B, in the first sentence, inserted clause (ii), redesignated former clause (ii) as clause (iii) and made a related change; substituted “clause (iii)” for “clause (ii)” in the second sentence; and added the last sentence.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 318, in subdivision B (ii), deleted “and” at the end of the subdivision; inserted “and” to the end of subdivision B (ii); added subdivision B (iv); substituted “clauses (iii) and (iv)” for “clause (iii)” in the first sentence following subdivision B (iv) and deleted “pursuant to clause (ii)” following “cancellation” in the last sentence.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 382 inserted “and in accordance with the requirements of subsection B1” at the end of clause (ii) in subsection B; and added subsection B1.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 686 substituted “22 days” for “twenty-nine days” in the second sentence of subsection A; added subsection B2; and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 686 inserted “or from the State Board based on information received from the Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements Program (SAVE Program) pursuant to subsection E of §

24.2-404

” in clause (ii) of subsection B and in subsection B1.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 740 substituted “Department of Elections” for “State Board” in the first sentence of subsection B and the first and second sentences of subsection B1; and substituted “Department’s” for “State Board’s” in the first sentence of subsection B2.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 4 and 28 are identical, and in subsection B, inserted “promptly” in the introductory language of the first sentence, substituted “deceased; (ii) all persons known by him to be disqualified” for “deceased or disqualified” in clauses (i) and (ii) of the first sentence, redesignated former clauses (ii) through (v) as current clauses (ii) through (v) in the first sentence, and substituted “(iv) and (v)” for “(iii) and (iv)” in the second sentence.

The 2022 amendment by c. 318 in subsection B, substituted “subsection C” for “subsection B1” in clause (ii) and rewrote the last sentence, which read: “The general registrar shall mail notice of any cancellation to the person whose registration is cancelled”; and redesignated former subsections B1, B2, and C as current subsections C through E.

The 2022 amendment by c. 318 in subsection B, substituted “subsection C” for “subsection B1” in clause (ii) and rewrote the last sentence, which read: “The general registrar shall mail notice of any cancellation to the person whose registration is cancelled”; and redesignated former subsections B1, B2, and C as current subsections C through E.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Election Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 121 (2006).

§ 24.2-428.
Regular periodic review of registration records; notice to voters identified as having moved; placement on inactive status for failure to respond to notice.

The Department of Elections shall establish a voter list maintenance program using the change of address information supplied by the United States Postal Service through its licensees or by other reliable sources to identify voters whose addresses may have changed. Any such program shall be regular and periodic and shall be conducted at least annually. The program shall be completed not later than ninety days prior to the date of a federal primary or federal general election.

If it appears from information provided by the Postal Service or by other reliable sources that a voter has moved to a different address in the same county or city in which the voter is currently registered, the Department shall provide to the general registrar the information necessary to change the registration records to show the new address, and the Department or the general registrar shall send to the new address of the voter by forwardable mail, a notice of the change, along with a postage prepaid, pre-addressed return card by which the voter may verify or correct the address information.

If it appears from information provided by the Postal Service or by other reliable sources that a voter has moved to a different address not in the same county or city, the Department or the general registrar shall send to the last known address of the voter by forwardable mail, a notice on a form prescribed by the Department, along with a postage prepaid and pre-addressed return card on which the voter may state his current address.

The registered voter shall complete and sign the return card subject to felony penalties for making false statements pursuant to §

24.2-1016

.

The general registrar shall correct his registration records from the information obtained from the return card. If the information indicates that the registered voter has moved to another general registrar’s jurisdiction within the Commonwealth, the general registrar shall transfer the registration record, along with the return card, to the appropriate general registrar who shall treat the request for a change of address as a request for transfer and shall send a voter registration card as confirmation of the transfer to the voter pursuant to §

24.2-424

. If the general registrar does not receive the return card provided for in subsection C of this section within thirty days after it is sent to the voter, the registered voter’s name shall be placed on inactive status. A registered voter’s failure to receive the notice shall not affect the validity of the inactivation.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-96, 24-97, 24-107; 1954, c. 690; 1962, c. 536; 1964, c. 538; 1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-59, 24.1-60; 1972, c. 620; 1973, c. 30; 1975, c. 515; 1976, c. 616; 1982, c. 650; 1986, c. 241; 1990, c. 313; 1991, c. 10; 1993, c. 641; 1996, cc. 72, 73; 2000, c. 857; 2015, c. 740.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 857 inserted “State Board of Elections or the” preceding “general registrar” in subsections B and C.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 740 substituted “Department of Elections” for “State Board” in subsection A; substituted “Department” for “State Board of Elections” twice in subsection B and once in subsection C; and substituted “Department” for “State Board” in subsection C.

§ 24.2-428.1.
Other procedures for assigning registered voters to inactive status.

In addition to the voter list maintenance program provided for in §

24.2-428

, the general registrar and the registered voter shall follow the confirmation notification procedures set forth in subsections C through E of §

24.2-428

if a voter provides an address on a candidate or referendum petition that differs from the address for the voter on the voter registration system or if any of the following documents sent to the registered voter are returned by the Postal Service as undeliverable:

An acknowledgment of registration;

An acknowledgment of transfer to a new address;

An absentee ballot or application for an absentee ballot sent or provided in accordance with Chapter 7 (§

24.2-700

et seq.);

Notification to a voter after a precinct reassignment;

Notification of a change of address sent to a voter in accordance with subsection B of §

24.2-428

; or

Any official voter registration or election mail.

History.

1996, cc. 72, 73; 2001, c. 625.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 625 inserted “if a voter provides an address on a candidate or referendum petition that differs from the address for the voter on the voter registration system or” in the introductory language.

§ 24.2-428.2.
Return of registered voter to active status.

A registered voter shall be returned to active status from inactive status if, during the period beginning on the date the voter was assigned to inactive status and ending on the day of the second general election for federal office thereafter, the voter:

Notifies the general registrar of a change of address within the county or city;

Responds to a confirmation notice with information that the voter continues to reside at the registration address;

Votes or attempts to vote in a primary or a special or general election and, if necessary, corrects the registration record; or

Transfers his registration to another county or city within the Commonwealth, pursuant to §

24.2-424

or subsection E of §

24.2-428

.

If the registered voter fails to take such action on or before the day of the second general election for federal office after the voter was placed on inactive status, the general registrar shall cancel the person’s voter registration.

The general registrar shall post at the courthouse or have published in a newspaper of general circulation in his county or city a list of names of persons whose registration has been cancelled pursuant to this section. He shall deliver or mail, obtaining a certificate of mailing, a certified copy of the list to the chairman of each political party in his county or city.

History.

1996, cc. 72, 73.

§ 24.2-429.
Maintenance of accurate registration records by general registrar; notice and hearing before cancellation.

Whenever a registered voter is alleged to be improperly registered, except for reason of removal of residence from the precinct, either by the general registrar or by any three qualified voters of the county or city who make such an allegation to the general registrar, the registrar shall post at the courthouse or publish in a newspaper of general circulation in his county or city the name of the registered voter on a list of persons whose registrations are to be cancelled by the general registrar. The list shall be certified by the registrar and delivered or sent by mail to the county or city chairman of each political party. If sent by mail, the general registrar shall obtain a certificate of mailing. In addition to the posted or published list, the general registrar shall send a notice by mail to the last known address of each registered voter on the list, stating the reasons provided by law for the cancellation, the facts on which the cancellation is based, and when the registrar, at his office during regular office hours, will hear testimony produced for or against the right of persons named in the notice to be retained on the registration records. The hearings shall be held not less than ten days after the mailing of the notice, and in no event shall be within sixty days of the general election in November or within thirty days of any other election in the county or city.

At the hearing, the registrar shall hear the testimony produced and shall determine if the registered voter named in the notice is qualified to vote in the county or city. If the person is no longer qualified to vote, the registrar shall cancel the voter’s registration. Nothing contained in this section shall prevent the registered voter from applying to the general registrar for a transfer to his proper jurisdiction, provided the registration records are not closed as provided by law. The general registrar may continue the hearing for a period of not more than thirty days in order to complete his examination. If the registered voter so challenged fails to appear and defend his right to be registered, his registration shall be cancelled by the general registrar.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-59, 24-60, 24-60.1, 24-71 through 24-73, 24-90, 24-93, 24-94, 24-97, 24-98, 24-101, 24-107, 24-108, 24-111; 1954, c. 690; 1958, c. 576; 1962, cc. 422, 536; 1964, c. 538; 1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-46(13), 24.1-60, 24.1-61; 1972, c. 620; 1973, c. 30; 1974, c. 428; 1976, c. 616; 1979, c. 329; 1980, c. 639; 1982, c. 650; 1983, c. 398; 1984, c. 480; 1986, c. 558; 1990, c. 193; 1991, c. 10; 1993, c. 641; 1996, cc. 72, 73.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elections, §§ 23 - 25.

§ 24.2-430.
Appeal from decision of registrar.

Any person whose registration was cancelled in accordance with the decision of the general registrar pursuant to §

24.2-429

, shall have the right of appeal, as provided in §

24.2-422

, to the circuit court of the county or city in which he offers to register.
Any qualified voter of the county or city shall have the same right of appeal from the decision of the general registrar refusing to cancel the registration of any person alleged to be improperly registered.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-99, 24-109; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-62; 1993, c. 641.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elections, § 24.

§ 24.2-431.
Petition to court objecting to registration.

In addition to challenging a voter’s registration before the general registrar, any three qualified voters may file with the circuit court of the county or city in which they are registered, a petition stating their objections to the registration of any person whose name is on the registration records for their county or city. However, no petition may be filed if the only objection raised is based on removal of residence from the precinct.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-102; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-63; 1993, c. 641; 1996, cc. 72, 73.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elections, § 23.

§ 24.2-432.
Notice to person objected to and decision of court.

Fifteen days’ notice shall be given by the petitioners to any person whose registration is objected to pursuant to §

24.2-431

, and the court shall summarily proceed to determine the right of the person to registration.
The determination shall be without the necessity of formal pleadings and in preference to all other matters on the docket. An order of the court concerning registration of the voter shall not be limited by the provisions of §

24.2-416

requiring the registration records to be closed.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-103; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-64; 1993, c. 641.

§ 24.2-433.
Appeal from decision of court.

From the judgment of the court, an appeal shall lie, as a matter of right, to the Court of Appeals. The appeal shall be placed on the privileged docket and be heard by the next available panel of the court.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-104; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-65; 1974, c. 428; 1993, c. 641; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 3 provides: “That any case for which a notice of appeal to the Supreme Court has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, shall continue in the Supreme Court of Virginia and shall not be affected by the provisions of this act.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 4 provides: “That any case for which a petition for appeal in a criminal case to the Court of Appeals has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, and a decision on such petition remains pending, such petition for appeal shall be deemed granted and the clerk of the Court of Appeals shall certify the granting of such petition to the trial court and all counsel. Such case shall be considered mature for purposes of further proceedings from the date of such certificate.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending
§

17.1-400

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective in due course and that the remaining provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, effective January 1, 2022, substituted “Court of Appeals” for “Supreme Court of Virginia” in the first sentence; and substituted “by the next available panel” for “at the next ensuing session” in the second sentence.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elections, § 24.

§ 24.2-434.
Presumption if petition not brought within six months of registration.

Unless the petition provided for in §

24.2-431

is filed within six months after the registration of any person, it shall be conclusively presumed in all proceedings where the right of such person to registration arises, by election officers and by judicial tribunals, or in election contests of any kind and character, that such person has complied with all the procedural requirements of the law in making an application for registration.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-105; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-66; 1993, c. 641.

§ 24.2-435.
Cancellation records to be retained for specified periods.

The registration records of voters whose registration has been cancelled pursuant to this article shall be retained for two years from the date of cancellation by the general registrar. However, the registration records of voters whose registration has been cancelled because the voter has moved to another state or the voter has submitted changes to his registration records shall be retained for four years.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-59, 24-60, 24-60.1, 24-71 through 24-73, 24-90, 24-93, 24-94, 24-96, 24-101, 24-111; 1958, c. 576; 1962, cc. 422, 536; 1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-46(12), 24.1-59; 1972, c. 620; 1973, c. 30; 1974, c. 428; 1975, c. 515; 1976, c. 616; 1979, c. 329; 1980, c. 639; 1982, c. 650; 1983, c. 398; 1984, c. 480; 1986, cc. 241, 558; 1990, cc. 193, 313; 1993, c. 641; 2003, c. 238.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 238 substituted “two” for “four” in the first sentence, and added the last sentence.